District of Columbia statutes.
44-774

Repealed

Private facilities — Council authorized to promulgate regulations.

Repealed.

Apr. 20, 1908, 35 Stat. 65, ch. 148, § 4
Mar. 9, 1983, D.C. Law 4-171, § 19(b), 29 DCR 5297
Feb. 24, 1984, D.C. Law 5-48, § 12(i), 30 DCR 5778
1981 Ed., § 32-104.
1973 Ed., § 32-304.